Hawaii statutes.
[§661B-1]
Statement of claim for compensation. (a)
Any person convicted in a court of the State and imprisoned for one or more
crimes of which the person was actually innocent may file a petition for relief
pursuant to this chapter for an award of damages against the State; provided
that the requirements of subsection (b) are met.

(b) To present an
actionable claim against the State for wrongful conviction and imprisonment,
the petitioner shall allege that the petitioner was convicted of one or more crimes
under the laws of the State, was subsequently sentenced to a term of
imprisonment, and has served all or any part of the sentence and either that:

(1) The judgment of conviction was reversed or
vacated because the petitioner was actually innocent of the crimes for which
the petitioner was convicted, and the court decision so states; or

(2) The petitioner was pardoned because the
petitioner was actually innocent of the crimes for which the petitioner was
convicted and the pardon so states. [L 2016, c 156, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next